Tennessee, session 114, HB2374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-139(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) If a court issues a bench warrant or a capias due to a defendant's failure to
appear on a felony that is violent or sexual in nature as determined by the court, then the
defendant shall be placed on any available state or federal list or database as a fugitive
from justice, including the National Crime Information Center.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-139(d)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) The court may relieve the surety of liability for an undertaking if the defendant
has not been placed on the available state or federal list or database within ten (10)
business days of the entering agency's receipt of the bench warrant or capias.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2374
011280
- 1 -